Washington statutes.
RCW 19.330.030

Acts not constituting violation of chapter.

No action may be brought under this chapter, and no liability results, where:

(1) The end article or end product sold or offered for sale in this state and alleged to violate RCW 19.330.020 is:

(a) A copyrightable end product;

(b) Merchandise manufactured by or on behalf of, or pursuant to a license from, a copyright owner and which displays or embodies a name, character, artwork, or other indicia of or from a work that falls within (a) of this subsection, or merchandise manufactured by or on behalf of, or pursuant to a license from, a copyright or trademark owner and that displays or embodies a name, character, artwork, or other indicia of or from a theme park, theme park attraction, or other facility associated with a theme park; or

(c) Packaging, carrier media, or promotional or advertising materials for any end article, end product, or merchandise that falls within (a) or (b) of this subsection;

(2) The allegation that the information technology is stolen or misappropriated is based on a claim that the information technology or its use infringes a patent or misappropriates a trade secret under applicable law or that could be brought under any provision of Title 35 of the United States Code;

(3) The allegation that the information technology is stolen or misappropriated is based on a claim that the defendant's use of the information technology violates the terms of a license that allows users to modify and redistribute any source code associated with the technology free of charge; or

(4) The allegation is based on a claim that the person violated RCW 19.330.020 by aiding, abetting, facilitating, or assisting someone else to acquire, appropriate, use, sell, or offer to sell, or by providing someone else with access to, information technology without authorization of the owner of the information technology or the owner's authorized licensee in violation of applicable law.

[ 2011 c 98 s 3.]